API/spylls/examples/si_LK.dic
අංගනා/10,350,351
අනුග්‍රාහිකා/10,350,351
අප්සරා/10,350,351
උඩරට/31,302,301,304
හෝටලය/37,303,301,302
මත්තල/37,304,302
මුල/37,302
දැන/240,247
දෙන්නේ/240,271
නා/200,204,227,246
පා/200,204,227,246
රඟපා/200,204,227,246
අතගා/200,204,227,246
අතුගා/200,204,227,246
තතුබා/200,204,227,246
බලපා/200,204,227,246
රඟපා/200,204,227,246
මවාපා/200,204,227,246
කියාපා/200,204,227,246
වන්නේ/240,271
සිටියේ/240,271
ඇත්තේ/240,271
පෙව/248
පොව/249
වව/250
වැව/251
පිළිබඳ/300
ලොව/302,301,304
උපකුලපති/302,270
ගෘහයන්/302,270
සිසුන්/302,270
හෝටල්කරුවන්/270
දෙමව්පියන්/270,271,302
ලියුම්කරු/270
මිනිස්සුන්/270
ගොඩනැගිල්ල/302
නිරෝධායන/302,301,271
එකඟතාව/303
ප්‍රමුඛතාව/303
කිහිපය/302
ළමුන්/302,270
පෙන්වීම/302,301
ළඳුන්/270,302
ඉංග්‍රිසින්/302,270
ගුවන්තොටුපළ/302
කරන්නිය/271,302
පෙළෙන්නිය/271,302
ජීවිතේ/302
ආපස්ස/302,301
දුරස්/271
